Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-616.03
Filing and issuing vital records; additional methods authorized.

The department may accept for filing and issue certified copies of vital records generated from microfilm, imaging, electronic means, or any other medium as designated by the department.

Laws 1994, LB 886, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 528;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 417.